Alabama, session 2026rs, HB53.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The following amendment to the Constitution
of Alabama of 2022, is proposed:
PROPOSED AMENDMENT
Section 95 of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, is
amended to read as follows:
Page 1

amended to read as follows:
HB53 INTRODUCED
"Section 95
(a) There can be no law of this state impairing the
obligation of contracts by destroying or impairing the remedy
for their enforcement; and the legislature Legislature shall
have no power to revive any right or remedy which may have
become barred by lapse of time, or by any statute of this
state. After suit has been commenced on any cause of action,
the legislature Legislature shall have no power to take away
such cause of action, or destroy any existing defense to such
suit.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the Legislature, by
general law, may revive any right or remedy relating to sexual
abuse of a minor which may have become barred by lapse of
time."
Upon ratification of this constitutional amendment, the
Code Commissioner shall number and place this amendment as
appropriate in the constitution omitting this instructional
paragraph and may make the following nonsubstantive revisions:
change capitalization, hierarchy, spelling, and punctuation
for purposes of style and uniformity; correct manifest
grammatical, clerical, and typographical errors; revise
internal or external citations and cross-references; harmonize
language; and translate effective dates.
END OF PROPOSED AMENDMENT
Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
shall be held in accordance with Sections 284 and 285 of the
Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws of this
state. The appropriate election official shall assign a ballot
Page 2

state. The appropriate election official shall assign a ballot
HB53 INTRODUCED
number for the proposed constitutional amendment on the
election ballot and shall set forth the following description
of the substance or subject matter of the proposed
constitutional amendment:
"Proposing an amendment to the Constitution of Alabama
of 2022, to provide that the Legislature, by general law, may
revive any right or remedy relating to sexual abuse of a minor
which may have lapsed due to passage of time.
Proposed by Act ____."
This description shall be followed by the following
language:
"Yes( ) No( )."
Section 3. The proposed amendment shall become valid as
a part of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, when approved
by a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
Page 3